Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Certificate of Authority

§ 17-19-1501.
Authority to transact business required.

A foreign corporation may not transact business in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority from the secretary of state.

The following activities, among others, do not constitute transacting business within the meaning of subsection (a) of this section:

Maintaining, defending or settling any proceeding;

Holding meetings of the board of directors or members or carrying on other activities concerning internal corporate affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange and registration of memberships or securities or maintaining trustees or depositaries with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, and security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in property securing the debts;

Owning, without more, real or personal property;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty (30) days and that is not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature;

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

The list of activities in subsection (b) of this section is not exhaustive.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1502.
Consequences of transacting business without authority.

A foreign corporation transacting business in this state without a certificate of authority shall not maintain a proceeding in any court in this state until it obtains a certificate of authority.

The successor to a foreign corporation that transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority and the assignee of a cause of action arising out of that business shall not maintain a proceeding on that cause of action in any court in this state until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains a certificate of authority.

A court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign corporation, its successor or assignee until it determines whether the foreign corporation or its successor requires a certificate of authority. If it so determines, the court may further stay the proceeding until the foreign corporation or its successor obtains the certificate.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 35, § 2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the failure of a foreign corporation to obtain a certificate of authority does not impair the validity of its corporate acts or prevent it from defending any proceeding in this state.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2000, ch. 35, § 2.

§ 17-19-1503.
Application for certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state by delivering an application to the secretary of state. The application shall set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation or, if its name is unavailable for use in this state, a corporate name that satisfies the requirements of W.S.

17-19-1506

;

The name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

The date of incorporation and period of duration;

The street address of its principal office and an email address for the foreign corporation;

The address of its registered office in this state and the name of its registered agent at that office;

The names and usual business or home addresses of its current directors and officers;

Whether the foreign corporation has members;

Whether the corporation, if it had been incorporated in this state, would be a public benefit, mutual benefit or religious corporation;

A statement that the corporation accepts the constitution of the state of Wyoming in compliance with the requirement of article 10 section 5 of the Wyoming constitution; and

Any additional information as may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the secretary of state to determine whether the corporation is entitled to a certificate of authority to transact business in this state and to determine and assess the fees and license taxes under the laws of this state.

The foreign corporation shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence dated not more than sixty (60) days prior to filing in Wyoming, or a document of similar import, duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law it is incorporated.

The application for certificate of authority shall be accompanied by a written consent to appointment by the registered agent.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "and an email address for the foreign corporation" at the end of (a)(iv).

§ 17-19-1504.
Amended certificate of authority.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall obtain an amended certificate of authority from the secretary of state if it changes:

Its corporate name;

The period of its duration; or

The state or country of its incorporation.

The requirements of W.S.

17-19-1503

for obtaining an original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended certificate under this section.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-1505.
Effect of certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is issued to transact business in this state subject, however, to the right of the state to revoke the certificate as provided in this act.

A foreign corporation with a valid certificate of authority has the same rights and enjoys the same privileges as and, except as otherwise provided by this act, is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties and liabilities now or later imposed on, a domestic corporation of like character.

This act does not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in all three subsections, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1506.
Corporate name of foreign corporation.

If the corporate name of a foreign corporation does not satisfy the requirements of W.S.

17-19-401

, the foreign corporation, to obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, may use a fictitious name to transact business in this state if its real name is unavailable and it delivers to the secretary of state for filing a copy of the resolution of its board of directors, certified by its secretary, adopting the fictitious name.

Except as authorized by subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the corporate name, including a fictitious name, of a foreign corporation shall not be the same as, nor deceptively similar to any trademark or service mark registered in this state and shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from other business names as required by W.S.

17-16-401

.

A foreign corporation may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 17-16-401(c).

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 80, § 3.

A foreign corporation may use in this state the name, including the fictitious name, of another domestic or foreign corporation that is used in this state if the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state and the foreign corporation has:

Merged with the other corporation; or

Been formed by reorganization of the other corporation; or

Has acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including the corporate name, of the other corporation.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 80, § 3.

If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state changes its corporate name to one that does not satisfy the requirements of W.S.

17-19-401

, it may not transact business in this state under the changed name until it adopts a name satisfying the requirements of W.S.

17-19-401

and obtains an amended certificate of authority under W.S.

17-19-1504

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 1996, ch. 80, §§ 2, 3.

§ 17-19-1507.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.

Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

; and

A registered agent as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

.

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

The provisions of W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

shall apply to all foreign corporations.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, §§ 2, 3.

The 2008 amendment,

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by rewroting (a)(i) and (a)(ii), in part by repealing (a)(ii)(A) through (C), relating to registered agents; and inserting (b).

§ 17-19-1508.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1, related to changes of registered office or registered agent of foreign corporations.

§ 17-19-1509.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1, related to resignations of registered agents of foreign corporations.

§ 17-19-1510.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1, related to service on foreign corporations.